Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$7,921,492 to the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife activities  to implement Ar-
ticle XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$5,379,892 to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife for activities and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 3. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$8,335,362 to the State Department of Agriculture for activities and projects to  implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$4,687,925 to the Department of Environmental Quality for activities and projects  to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,026,241 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board from lottery moneys
deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund established  under ORS 541.945,
for operating expenses, activities  and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the
Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Watershed En-
hancement Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 17,270
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 2,992,216
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement
Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 2,349,709
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 39,322,808
SECTION 8. (1) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall establish by rule a
process for allocating on  a quarterly basis available moneys in the Natural Resources Sub-
account of the Parks and Natural Resources  Fund, established under ORS 541.942, to fulfill
the biennial allocations made in this 2017 Act. Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, all quarterly allocations shall be set at one-eighth of the biennial allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys transferred  from the Oregon State Lottery Fund to the
Parks and  Natural Resources Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations es-
tablished under subsection (1) of this section, the allocations shall be reduced proportionately
by amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 9. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 2